California statutes. Education Code
(d) This article applies to all public schools, including, but not limited to, charter schools and alternative schools.

(e) This article is declarative of existing law and shall not be interpreted to prohibit the imposition of a fee, deposit, or other charge otherwise allowed by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 776, Sec. 1.   (AB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

49012.

(a) Commencing with the 2014–15 fiscal year, and every three years thereafter, the department shall develop and distribute guidance for county superintendents of schools, district superintendents, and charter school administrators regarding the imposition of pupil fees for participation in educational activities in public schools. The department shall post the guidance on the department’s Internet Web site.

(b) The guidance developed pursuant to subdivision
 (a) shall not constitute a regulation subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 776, Sec. 1.   (AB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

49013.

(a) A complaint of noncompliance with the requirements of this article may be filed with the principal of a school under the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) A complaint may be filed anonymously if the complaint provides evidence or information leading to evidence to support an allegation of noncompliance with the requirements of this article.

(c) A complainant not satisfied with the decision of a public school may appeal the decision to the department and shall receive a written appeal decision within 60 days of the department’s receipt of the appeal.

(d) If a public school finds merit in a complaint, or the department finds merit in an appeal, the public school shall provide a remedy to all affected pupils, parents, and guardians that, where applicable, includes reasonable efforts by the public school to ensure full reimbursement to all affected pupils, parents, and guardians, subject to procedures established through regulations adopted by the state board.

(e) Information regarding the requirements of this article shall be included in the annual notification distributed to pupils, parents and guardians, employees, and other interested parties pursuant to Section 4622 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(f) Public schools shall establish local policies and procedures to implement the provisions of this section on or before March 1,
 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 776, Sec. 1.   (AB 1575)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

49014.

(a) A pupil or former pupil, unless emancipated at the time the debt is incurred, shall not owe or be billed for a debt owed to a public school or school district.

(b) A public school or school district shall not, because of a debt owed to the public school or school district, take negative action against a pupil or former pupil, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Denying full credit for any assignments for a class.

(2) Denying full and equal participation in classroom activity.

(3) Denying access to on-campus educational facilities, including, but not limited to, the library.

(4) Denying or withholding grades or transcripts.

(5) Denying or withholding a diploma.

(6) Limiting or barring participation in an extracurricular activity, club, or sport.

(7) Limiting or excluding from participation in an educational activity, field trip, or school ceremony.

(c) (1) A public school or school district shall provide an itemized invoice for any amount owed by the parent or guardian on behalf of a pupil or former pupil before pursuing payment of the debt
 and shall provide a receipt to the parent or guardian of a pupil or former pupil for each payment made to the public school or school district for any amount owed by the parent or guardian on behalf of the pupil or former pupil.

(2) The invoice required in paragraph (1) shall include references to school policies relating to debt collection and the rights established in this section and Section 49557.5.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (g), a debt collector, as defined in Section 803 of the federal Fair Debt Collection Practices Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1692a), shall not report a debt owed by a parent or guardian to a credit reporting agency if the debt collector is contracted with a
 public school or school district for the purpose of pursuing the repayment of a debt owed by a parent or guardian of a pupil or former pupil.

(e) A public school or school district shall not sell debt owed by a parent or guardian of a pupil or former pupil.

(f) Any waiver by a parent, guardian, pupil, or former pupil of the provisions of this section is contrary to public policy and shall be unenforceable and void.

(g) (1) This section shall not apply to debt owed as a result of vandalism or to cover the replacement cost of public school or school district books, supplies, or property loaned to a pupil that the pupil fails to return or that are willfully cut, defaced, or otherwise injured. A public
 school or school district may offer a pupil or former pupil, with the permission of the parent or guardian of the pupil or former pupil, alternative, nonmonetary forms of compensation to settle debt described in this paragraph. Alternatives that include service or work in exchange for repayment of a debt shall comply with all provisions of the Labor Code, including those sections relating to youth employment.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if the pupil is a current or former homeless child or youth or a current or former foster youth.

(h) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Foster youth” has the same meaning as in Section 42238.01.

(2) “Homeless child or youth” has the same meaning as “homeless children and youths” in Section 11434a(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) “Public school” includes the state special schools, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 48927, charter schools, schools operated by a county office of education, and schools within a school district.

(4) “School district” means a school district or county office of education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 577, Sec. 2.   (AB 1974)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Athletic Programs [49020. - 49024.]

49020.

It is the intent of the Legislature that opportunities for participation in interschool athletic programs in public high schools of the state be provided on as equal a basis as is practicable to male and female students. The costs of providing these equal opportunities may vary according to the type of sports contained within the respective male and female athletic programs. Additional sources of revenue should be determined to provide for these equal opportunity programs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49021.

It is the intent of the Legislature that opportunities for participation in athletics be provided on an equitable basis to all students.

It is the further intent of the Legislature that females be given the same opportunity to participate in athletics and compete with other females in individual and team sports as is available to males who compete with other males in individual and team sports.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49022.

Insofar as practicable, in apportioning public funds school district governing boards shall apportion amounts available for athletics to ensure that equitable amounts will be allocated for all students, except that allowances may be made for differences in the costs of various athletic programs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49023.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no public funds shall be used in connection with athletic programs conducted under the auspices of a school district governing board or any student organization within the district, which do not provide facilities and opportunities for participation by both sexes on an equitable basis. Facilities and opportunities for participation include, but are not limited to, equipment and supplies, scheduling of games and practice time, compensation for coaches, travel arrangements, per diem, locker rooms, and medical services.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49024.

(a) Prior to assuming a paid or volunteer position to work with pupils in a pupil activity program sponsored by a school district, all noncertificated candidates shall obtain an Activity Supervisor Clearance Certificate from the Commission on Teacher Credentialing pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 44258.7.

(b) A pupil activity program sponsored by
 a school district includes, but is not limited to, scholastic programs, interscholastic programs, and extracurricular activities sponsored by a school district or school booster club, including, but not limited to, cheer team, drill team, dance team, and marching band.

(c) Volunteer supervisors for breakfast, lunch, or other nutritional periods pursuant to Sections 44814 and 44815, and nonteaching volunteer aides, as defined in Section 35021, under the immediate supervision and direction of certificated personnel of the district, shall not be required to obtain an Activity Supervisor Clearance Certificate. For purposes of this section, a nonteaching volunteer aide
 includes a parent volunteering in a classroom or on a field trip or a community member providing noninstructional services.

(d) Candidates may be issued a temporary certificate in accordance with Sections 44332 and 44332.5 while the application is being processed.

(e) This section does not apply to a candidate who is required by the school district to clear a Department of Justice and Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal background check prior to beginning the paid or volunteer activities described in subdivision (a).

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 52, Sec. 2.   (AB 346)   Effective July 9, 2010.   Note: Operative date in subd. (f) originated in a prior version of this section.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Performance-Enhancing Substances [49030. - 49034.]

49030.

(a) Sixty days after the posting of the United States Anti-Doping Agency Guide to Prohibited Substances and Prohibited Methods of Doping on the Internet Web site of the department pursuant to subdivision (b), dietary supplements, as defined by subsection (ff) of Section 321 of Title 21 of the United States Code, that include any of the following substances, are prohibited from being used by a pupil participating in interscholastic high school sports:

(1) Synephrine.

(2) A prohibited substance enumerated by the United States Anti-Doping Agency Guide to Prohibited Substances and Prohibited Methods of Doping.

(b) The State Department of Health Services shall provide the State Department of Education with the United States Anti-Doping Agency Guide to Prohibited Substances and Prohibited Methods of Doping, on or before March 30, 2006. Upon receipt of the guide, the State Department of Education shall notify each school district that serves pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, that the guide has been completed and shall post the guide on its Internet Web site. The State Department of Health Services shall annually notify the State Department of Education of any amendments to the guide for the following school year. For an amendment to be applicable for the ensuing school year, the State Department of Health Services shall notify the State Department of Education as to that amendment no later than the March 30 immediately preceding the school year to which the amendment is to be applicable. Upon receipt of this notice, the State Department of Education shall notify each school district that serves pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, that the guide has been amended and shall post the amended guide on its Internet Web site. The amendment becomes effective 60 days after the department posts the amended guide on its Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 113.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

49031.

(a) A school may not accept a sponsorship from a manufacturer of a dietary supplement described in subdivision (a) of Section 49030, or from the distributor of a dietary supplement described in subdivision (a) of Section 49030 whose name appears on the labeling of the dietary supplement.

(b) A dietary supplement prohibited by Section 49030 may not be marketed on a schoolsite or at a school-related event.

(c) A dietary supplement prohibited by Section 49030 may not be sold or distributed on a schoolsite or at a school-related event.

(d) (1) For purposes of subdivision (b), “market” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Direct product advertising.

(B) Provision of educational materials.

(C) Product promotion by a school district employee or school district volunteer.

(D) Product placement.

(E) Clothing or equipment giveaways.

(F) Scholarships.

(2) For purposes of subdivision (b), “market” does not include the inadvertent display of a product name or product advertising by a person who is not a manufacturer or distributor of a dietary supplement described in subdivision (a) of Section 49030.

(e) Subdivision (a) does not apply to either of the following:

(1) An affiliate of a manufacturer or distributor of a dietary supplement described in subdivision (a) of Section 49030 if the affiliate does not manufacture or distribute a dietary supplement described in subdivision (a).

(2) A manufacturer or distributor of a dietary supplement described in subdivision (a) if no more than 50 percent of its annual gross sales are derived from the manufacture or distribution of dietary supplements as defined in subsection (ff) of Section 321 of Title 21 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 673, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

49032.

(a) (1) Effective December 31, 2008, each high school sports coach shall have completed a coaching education program developed by his or her school district or the California Interscholastic Federation that meets the guidelines set forth in Section 35179.1.

(2) The coaching education program described by paragraph (1) may be taught by an athletic director or high school sports coach who is deemed to be qualified by the California Interscholastic Federation.

(b) Upon completion of the program, a high school sports coach shall be deemed to have completed the education requirement for the remainder of his or her time coaching at the high school level in any school district in the state.

(c) Each high school sports coach shall be responsible for the costs of taking the course.

(d) The training requirements of this section shall count toward the continuing education required for the renewal of the teaching credential of a coach who is also a certificated employee.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a high school sports coach who does not meet the requirements of subdivision (a) may be used for no longer than one season of interscholastic competition.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “high school sports coach” means an employee or a volunteer who is authorized by a high school to be responsible for leading a school sports team of pupil athletes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 673, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

49033.

The California Interscholastic Federation shall amend its constitution and bylaws to require, as a condition of participation in interscholastic sports, that school districts effective July 1, 2006, upon the notification provided pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 49030, shall prohibit a pupil from participating in interscholastic high school sports, unless that pupil signs a pledge not to use anabolic steroids, as defined in Section 802 of Title 21 of the United States Code, without a prescription from a licensed health care practitioner or a dietary supplement prohibited by Section 49030 and the parent and guardian of that pupil signs a notification form regarding those restrictions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 673, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

49034.

(a) The State Treasurer may accept voluntary contributions for the purpose of offsetting costs of training coaches pursuant to Sections 35179.2 and 35179.3. Contributions received by the State Treasurer shall be deposited in the California Coaching Education Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(b) Funds deposited in the California Coaching Education Fund are available upon appropriation by the Legislature and may only be expended for purposes of Sections 35179.2 and 35179.3, and for administration of the California Coaching Education Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 673, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Registering to Vote [49040. - 49041.]

49040.

(a) The last two full weeks in April and the last two full weeks in September shall be known as “high school voter education weeks,” during which time persons authorized by the county elections official shall be allowed to register students and school personnel on any high school campus in areas designated by the administrator of the high school, or his or her
 designee, which are reasonably accessible to all students.

(b) This section does not preclude a person from registering to vote students and school personnel on a high school campus as is otherwise permitted by the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 131, Sec. 1.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

49041.

(a) The administrator of a high school, or his or her designee, may appoint one or more pupils who are enrolled at that high school to be voter outreach coordinators.

(b) A voter outreach coordinator may coordinate voter registration activities on his or her high school campus that encourage persons who are eligible to register to vote pursuant to Section 2101 of the Elections Code, or other
 persons who may submit an affidavit of registration pursuant to Section 2102 of the Elections Code, to apply to register to vote by submitting an affidavit of registration on paper or electronically on the Internet Web site of the Secretary of State.

(c) A voter outreach coordinator may, with the approval of the administrator of the high school, or his or her designee, coordinate election-related activities on his or her
 high school campus, including voter registration drives, mock elections, debates, and other election-related pupil outreach activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 131, Sec. 2.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Searches by School Employees [49050. - 49051.]

49050.

No school employee shall conduct a search that involves:

(a) Conducting a body cavity search of a pupil manually or with an instrument. 

(b) Removing or arranging any or all of the clothing of a pupil to permit a visual inspection of the underclothing, breast, buttocks, or genitalia of the pupil.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

49051.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to affect the admissibility of evidence in subsequent juvenile or criminal proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Restorative Justice Practices [49055. - 49056.]

49055.

(a) On or before June 1, 2024, the department shall develop evidence-based best practices for restorative justice practice implementation on a school campus and make these best practices available on the department’s internet website for use by local educational agencies to implement restorative justice practices as part of efforts to improve campus culture and climate. In developing best practices, the department shall consult with all of the following to identify best practices for effective, evidence-based restorative justice practices in elementary and secondary schools:

 (1) School-based restorative justice practitioners.

(2) Educators from public schools serving kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

 (3) Pupils from public schools serving kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

 (4) Community partners or community members.

(5) Nonprofit and public entities.

(b) When developing best practices pursuant to subdivision (a), the department is encouraged to, to the extent feasible, take into account resources and best practices that have been identified or developed as part of aligned efforts, including, but not limited to, the Scaling Up MTSS Statewide (SUMS) Initiative, the California Community Schools Partnership Program, and
 resources developed by the department in support of social-emotional learning.

(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 914, Sec. 1.   (AB 2598)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49056.

(a) Commencing with the 2024–25 school year, all of the following shall apply to recess provided by a public elementary school:

(1) (A) Recess shall be at least 30 minutes on regular instructional days and at least 15 minutes on early release days and may be provided in one or more periods.

(B) The requirement pursuant to subparagraph (A) does not apply to days in which there is a field trip or other educational program.

(2) Recess shall be held outdoors whenever the weather and air quality permits. If outdoor space is not sufficient, recess may be held indoors.

(3) Recess shall comply with a pupil’s individualized education program or pupil’s plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794).

(4) (A) A public elementary school pupil shall not be denied recess by a member of the school’s staff unless the pupil’s participation poses an immediate threat to the physical safety of the pupil or to the physical safety of one or more of the pupil’s peers.

(B) If a pupil’s recess period is denied pursuant to subparagraph (A), school staff members shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve such threats and minimize exclusion from recess to the greatest extent practicable. School staff members are encouraged to use other means of correction, such as those specified in subdivision (b) of Section 48900.5.

(b) This section does not prohibit a public elementary school from providing pupils with a snack during recess.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Educational program” means the entire school-sponsored offering for pupils, including in-class and out-of-class activities.

(2) (A) “Public elementary school” means a school that is operated by a school district or county office of education, or a charter school that maintains kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 6, inclusive.

(B) For a school that also maintains a grade higher than grade 6, the provisions of this section apply only to recess provided to pupils in kindergarten and any of grades 1 to 6, inclusive.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), the provisions of this section do not apply to pupils in grade 6 of a school that maintains grade 6 as part of a middle school or that solely maintains some or all of grades 6 to 12, inclusive, if the grade 6 pupils receive physical education pursuant to the requirements of Section 51222.

(3) “Recess” means a period of time during the schoolday, separate and distinct from physical education courses and meal times, but may follow or precede physical education courses or meal times, when pupils are given supervised and unstructured time for any of the following:

(A) Physical activity.

(B) Play.

(C) Organized games.

(D) Social engagement with peers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 54.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6.5. Pupil Records [49060. - 49085.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Intent [49060. - 49060.]

49060.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to resolve potential conflicts between California law and the provisions of Public Law 93-380 regarding parental access to, and the confidentiality of, pupil records in order to ensure the continuance of federal education funds to public educational institutions within the state, and to revise generally and update the law relating to those records.

(b) This chapter applies to public agencies that provide educationally related services to pupils with disabilities pursuant to Chapter 26.5 (commencing with Section 7570) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code and to public agencies that educate pupils with disabilities in state hospitals or
 developmental centers and in youth and adult facilities.

(c) This chapter has no effect regarding public community colleges, other public or private institutions of higher education, other governmental or private agencies that receive federal education funds unless described herein, or, except for Sections 49068 and 40969.7 and paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 49076, private schools.

(d) The provisions of this chapter prevail over the provisions of Section 12400 of this code and Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code to the extent that they may pertain to access to pupil records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 71.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [49061. - 49061.]

49061.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Parent” means a natural parent, an adopted parent, or legal guardian. If the parents are divorced or legally separated, only a parent having legal custody of the pupil may challenge the content of a record pursuant to Section 49070, offer a written response to a record pursuant to Section 49072, or consent to release records to others pursuant to Section 49075. Either parent may grant consent if both parents have notified, in writing, the school or school district that an agreement has been made. If a pupil has attained the age of 18 years or is attending an institution of postsecondary education, the permission or consent required of, and the rights accorded to, the parents or guardian of the pupil shall thereafter only be required of, and accorded to, the
 pupil.

(b) “Pupil record” means any item of information directly related to an identifiable pupil, other than directory information, that is maintained by a school district or required to be maintained by an employee in the performance of his or her duties whether recorded by handwriting, print, tapes, film, microfilm, or other means.

“Pupil record” does not include informal notes related to a pupil compiled by a school officer or employee that remain in the sole possession of the maker and are not accessible or revealed to any other person except a substitute. For purposes of this subdivision, “substitute” means a person who performs the duties of the individual who made the notes on a temporary basis, and does not refer to a person who permanently succeeds the maker of the notes in his or her position.

(c) “Directory information” means
 one or more of the following items: pupil’s name, address, telephone number, date of birth, email address, major field of study, participation in officially recognized activities and sports, weight and height of members of athletic teams, dates of attendance, degrees and awards received, and the most recent previous public or private school attended by the pupil.

(d) “School district” means any school district maintaining any kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, any public school providing instruction in any kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, the office of the county superintendent of schools, or any special school operated by the department.

(e) “Access” means a personal inspection and review of a record or an accurate copy of a record, or receipt of an accurate copy of a record, an oral description or communication of a record or an accurate copy of a
 record, and a request to release a copy of any record.

(f) “County placing agency” means the county social service department or county probation department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 34.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Provisions [49062. - 49069.7.]

49062.

School districts shall establish, maintain, and destroy pupil records according to regulations adopted by the State Board of Education. Pupil records shall include a pupil’s health record. Such regulations shall establish state policy as to what items of information shall be placed into pupil records and what information is appropriate to be compiled by individual school officers or employees under the exception to pupil records provided in subdivision (b) of Section 49061. No pupil records shall be destroyed except pursuant to such regulations or as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 49070.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1347, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

49062.5.

(a) If a school district, charter school, or county office of education receives government-issued documentation, as described in subdivision (b), demonstrating that a former pupil’s legal name or gender has been changed, the school district, charter school, or county office of education shall update the former pupil’s records
 to include the updated legal name or gender. If requested by the former pupil, the school district, charter school, or county office of education shall reissue any documents conferred upon the former pupil with the former pupil’s updated legal name or gender. Documents that may be reissued by the school district, charter school, or county office of education include, but are not limited to, a transcript, a high school diploma conferred pursuant to Section 51410, a high school equivalency certificate issued pursuant to Section 51420, or other similar documents conferred upon the former pupil. This section does not require the school district, charter school, or county office of education to modify records that the former pupil has not requested for modification or reissuance. 

(b) The documentation provided by a former pupil demonstrating legal name or gender change may include, but need not be limited to, any of the following:

(1) State-issued driver’s license.

(2) Birth certificate.

(3) Passport.

(4) Social security card.

(5) Court order indicating a name change or a gender change, or both.

(c) If a former pupil requests that the former pupil’s
 name or gender be changed and the requested records are reissued, the school district, charter school, or county office of education shall add a new document to the former pupil’s file that includes all of the following:

(1) The date of the request.

(2) The date the requested records were reissued to the former pupil.

(3) A list of the records that were requested by, and reissued to, the former pupil.

(4) The type of documentation provided by the former pupil in order to demonstrate the legal name or gender change.

(5) The name of the school district, charter school, or county office of
 education staff person that completed the request.

(6) The current and former name or gender of the former pupil.

(d) The process to request a change to pupil records described in Section 49070 is separate from the process described in this section. Former pupils who are unable to provide the government-issued documentation described in subdivision (b) may request a name or gender change, or both, to the former pupil’s records through the process described in Section 49070.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 179, Sec. 1.   (AB 711)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

49063.

School districts shall notify parents in writing of their rights under this chapter upon the date of the pupil’s initial enrollment, and thereafter at the same time as notice is issued pursuant to Section 48980. The notice shall be, insofar as is practicable, in the home language of the pupil. The notice shall take a form that reasonably notifies parents of the availability of the following specific information:

(a) The types of pupil records and information contained therein that are directly related to pupils and maintained by the institution.

(b) The position of the official responsible for the maintenance of each type of record.

(c) The location of the log or record required to be maintained pursuant to Section 49064.

(d) The criteria to be used by the school district in defining “school officials and employees” and in determining “legitimate educational interest” as used in Section 49064 and paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 49076.

(e) The policies of the institution for reviewing and expunging those records.

(f) The right of the parent to access pupil records.

(g) The procedures for challenging the content of pupil records.

(h) The cost, if any, that will be charged to the parent for reproducing copies of records.

(i) The
 categories of information that the institution has designated as directory information pursuant to Section 49073.

(j) Any other rights and requirements set forth in this chapter, and the right of the parent to file a complaint with the United States Department of Education concerning an alleged failure by the school district to comply with the provisions of Section 444 of the General Education Provisions Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g).

(k) The availability of the prospectus prepared pursuant to Section 49091.14.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 507, Sec. 10.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

49064.

A log or record shall be maintained for each pupil’s record which lists all persons, agencies, or organizations requesting or receiving information from the record and the legitimate interests therefor. Such listing need not include:

(a) Parents or pupils to whom access is granted pursuant to Section 49069.7 or paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 49076;

(b) Parties to whom directory information is released pursuant to Section 49073;

(c) Parties to whom written consent has been executed by the parent pursuant to Section 49075; or

(d) School
 officials or employees having a legitimate educational interest pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 49076.

The log or record shall be open to inspection only by a parent and the school official, or the official’s designee, responsible for the maintenance of pupil records, and to the Comptroller General of the United States, the Secretary of Health, Education, and Welfare, and administrative head of an education agency as defined in Public Law 93-380, and state educational authorities as a means of auditing the operation of the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 66.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

49065.

Any school district may make a reasonable charge in an amount not to exceed the actual cost of furnishing copies of any pupil record; provided, however, that no charge shall be made for furnishing (1) up to two transcripts of former pupils’ records or (2) up to two verifications of various records of former pupils. No charge may be made to search for or to retrieve any pupil record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

49066.

(a) When grades are given for any course of instruction taught in a school district, the grade given to each pupil shall be the grade determined by the teacher of the course and the determination of the pupil’s grade by the teacher, in the absence of clerical or mechanical mistake, fraud, bad faith, or incompetency, shall be final.

(b) The governing board of the school district and the superintendent of such district shall not order a pupil’s grade to be changed unless the teacher who determined such grade is, to the extent practicable, given an opportunity to state orally, in writing, or both, the reasons for which such grade was given and is, to the extent practicable, included in all discussions relating to the changing of such grade.

(c) No grade of a pupil participating in a physical education class, however, may be adversely affected due to the fact that the pupil does not wear standardized physical education apparel where the failure to wear such apparel arises from circumstances beyond the control of the pupil.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

49066.5.

(a) (1) This section applies only to pupils enrolled in high school in the 2020–21 academic year.

(2) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(b) The parent, guardian, or education rights holder of a pupil or, for a pupil 18 years of age or older, the pupil who was enrolled in high school and enrolled in a course during the 2020–21 school year may apply to the pupil’s local educational agency to have a letter grade earned for that course, as reflected on the pupil’s transcript, changed to a Pass or No Pass grade.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a local educational agency shall grant a request described in subdivision (b). All of the following shall apply to the granting of the request:

(1) Subject to the conditions in subdivision (b), the local educational agency shall not limit the number or type of courses eligible for the grade change.

(2) The grade change shall not negatively affect the pupil’s grade point average.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, the grade change shall not result in the forfeiture of the pupil’s eligibility or entitlement to state or institutional student financial aid.

(d) The California State University shall, and private postsecondary educational institutions and the University of California are encouraged to, do both
 of the following:

(1) Accept for admission purposes, and without prejudice, a transcript with a Pass or No Pass grade instead of a letter grade for any coursework described in subdivision (b) for an applicant who had enrolled in a high school in the state during any school year from the 2020–21 school year to the 2023–24 school year, inclusive.

(2) Within 15 calendar days of the operative date of the act that added this section, notify the department if the institution will comply with paragraph (1).

(e) The department shall post on its internet website, and provide to local educational agencies, both of the following:

(1) Within 15 calendar days of the operative date of the act that added this section, an application template for use by local
 educational agencies for the grade change described in subdivision (b).
